Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 4. Denial, Suspension, or Revocation of Licenses and Permits.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The board may not require a restaurant licensee to forfeit his restaurant license upon obtaining a beverage dispensary license for the same premises, but the board may properly demand that the restaurant license be surrendered to the board temporarily, pending its transfer to another purchaser or location. September 27, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 04.11.320.
Denial of new licenses and permits.

An application requesting issuance of a new license shall be denied if

the board finds, after review of all relevant information, that issuance of the license would not be in the best interests of the public;

issuance of the license is prohibited by AS

04.11.410

, relating to location of premises near churches and schools;

the application has not been completed in accordance with AS

04.11.260

;

issuance of the license would violate the restrictions pertaining to the particular license imposed under this title;

issuance of the license is prohibited under this title as a result of an election conducted under AS

04.11.507

;

the requirements of AS

04.11.420

—

04.11.450

relating to zoning, ownership and location of the license, and the identity and financing of a licensee have not been met;

issuance of the license is prohibited under AS

04.11.400(a)

or prohibition of issuance of the license is found necessary under AS

04.11.400(b)

;

the application contains false statements of material fact;

the license is sought for the sale of alcoholic beverages in a first or second class city where there are no licensed premises at the time of application unless a majority of the voters have voted not to approve a local option to restrict or prohibit the sale of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.491

, have voted to approve a local option to allow the type of premises under AS

04.11.491

(a)(2) or (3), or have voted to remove a restriction or prohibition on the sale of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.495

; or

the license is sought for the sale of alcoholic beverages in an established village where there are no licensed premises at the time of application unless a majority of the voters have voted not to approve a local option to restrict or prohibit the sale of alcoholic beverages under AS 04.11.491, have voted to approve a local option to allow the type of premises under AS

04.11.491(b)(2)

, or have voted to remove a restriction or prohibition on the sale of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.495

.

An application requesting issuance of a new permit shall be denied if

the board finds, after review of all relevant information, that issuance of the permit would not be in the best interests of the public;

the board finds that any of the statements made in the application are untrue;

the application has not been completed in accordance with AS

04.11.260

; or

the permit is sought for the sale of alcoholic beverages in a first or second class city or established village where there are no licensed premises at the time of application unless a majority of the voters have voted not to approve a local option to restrict or prohibit the sale of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.491

, have voted to approve a local option to allow the type of permit under AS

04.11.491(a)(2)

or (b)(2), or have voted to remove a restriction or prohibition on the sale of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.495

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 12 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 11 ch 74 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

For licenses, see 13 AAC 104, art. 3.

For enforcement, see 13 AAC 104, art. 5.

Sec. 04.11.320.
Denial of new licenses and permits.

An application requesting issuance of a new license or endorsement shall be denied if

the board finds, after review of all relevant information, that issuance of the license or endorsement would not be in the best interests of the public;

issuance of the license is prohibited by AS

04.11.410

, relating to location of premises near churches and schools;

the application has not been completed in accordance with AS

04.11.260

;

issuance of the license or endorsement would violate the restrictions pertaining to the particular license or endorsement imposed under this title;

issuance of the license is prohibited under this title as a result of an election conducted under AS

04.11.507

;

the requirements of AS

04.11.420

—

04.11.450

relating to zoning, ownership and location of the license, and the identity and financing of a licensee have not been met or the requirements of AS

04.11.430(b)

relating to location of the endorsement have not been met;

issuance of the license is prohibited under AS

04.11.400(a)

or prohibition of issuance of the license is found necessary under AS

04.11.400(b)

;

the application contains false statements of material fact;

the license is sought for the sale of alcoholic beverages in a first or second class city where there are no licensed premises at the time of application unless a majority of the voters have voted not to approve a local option to restrict or prohibit the sale of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.491

, have voted to approve a local option to allow the type of premises under AS

04.11.491

(a)(2) or (3), or have voted to remove a restriction or prohibition on the sale of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.495

; or

the license is sought for the sale of alcoholic beverages in an established village where there are no licensed premises at the time of application unless a majority of the voters have voted not to approve a local option to restrict or prohibit the sale of alcoholic beverages under AS 04.11.491, have voted to approve a local option to allow the type of premises under AS

04.11.491(b)(2)

, or have voted to remove a restriction or prohibition on the sale of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.495

.

An application requesting issuance of a new permit shall be denied if

the board finds, after review of all relevant information, that issuance of the permit would not be in the best interests of the public;

the board finds that any of the statements made in the application are untrue;

the application has not been completed in accordance with AS

04.11.260

; or

the permit is sought for the sale of alcoholic beverages in a first or second class city or established village where there are no licensed premises at the time of application unless a majority of the voters have voted not to approve a local option to restrict or prohibit the sale of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.491

, have voted to approve a local option to allow the type of permit under AS

04.11.491(a)(2)

or (b)(2), or have voted to remove a restriction or prohibition on the sale of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.495

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 12 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 11 ch 74 SLA 1999; am § 35 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.330.
Denial of license or permit renewal.

An application requesting renewal of a license shall be denied if

the board finds, after review of all relevant information, that renewal of the license would not be in the best interests of the public;

the license has been revoked for any cause;

the applicant has not operated the licensed premises for at least 240 hours during each of the two preceding calendar years, unless the board determines that the licensed premises are under construction or cannot be operated through no fault of the applicant;

the board finds that issuance of an existing license under AS

04.11.400(d)

has not encouraged tourist trade;

the requirements of AS

04.11.420

—

04.11.450

relating to zoning, ownership of the license, and financing of the licensee have not been met;

renewal of the license would violate the restrictions pertaining to the particular license under this title or the license has been operated in violation of a condition or restriction imposed by the board;

renewal of the license is prohibited under this title as a result of an election conducted under AS

04.11.507

; or

the application has not been completed in accordance with AS

04.11.270

An application for renewal of a license may be denied if the applicant is delinquent in the payment of taxes if the tax liability arises in whole or in part out of the licensed business.

An application requesting renewal of a conditional contractor’s permit shall be denied if

the board finds, after review of all relevant information, that issuance of the permit would not be in the best interests of the public;

the application has not been completed in accordance with AS

04.11.270

.

Notwithstanding (a)(3) of this section, a recreational site license issued under AS

04.11.210

may be renewed if the license was exercised at least once during each of the two preceding calendar years.

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 1981; am §§ 22, 23 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 13 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 5 ch 59 SLA 2018; am § 36 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1994, in (a)(4) and (9) of this section, internal references were changed to reflect the 1994 reorganization of AS

04.11.400

.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 11, 2018, in (a)(3), substituted “for at least 240 hours” for “for at least 30 eight-hour days” following “licensed premises”.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The federal Internal Revenue Service may assert a lien-like interest, in the form of a hold on transfer of an Alaska liquor license, for taxes but it may not assert a traditional lien against a liquor license. January 17, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

The IRS may not foreclose on a liquor license against which it has a tax lien or lien-like interest. January 17, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

If the IRS has purported to seize a liquor license, it may not operate the license or transfer it to another person without board approval. January 17, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 04.11.330.
Denial of license or permit renewal.

An application requesting renewal of a license or endorsement shall be denied if

the board finds, after review of all relevant information, that renewal of the license or endorsement would not be in the best interests of the public;

the license or endorsement has been revoked for any cause;

the applicant has not operated the licensed premises for at least 240 hours during each of the two preceding calendar years, unless the board determines that the licensed premises are under construction or cannot be operated through no fault of the applicant;

the board finds that issuance of an existing beverage dispensary tourism license under AS

04.09.350

or seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license under AS

04.09.360

has not encouraged tourist trade;

the requirements of AS

04.11.420

—

04.11.450

relating to zoning, ownership of the license, and financing of the licensee have not been met;

renewal of the license or endorsement would violate the restrictions pertaining to the particular license or endorsement under this title or the license or endorsement has been operated in violation of a condition or restriction imposed by the board;

renewal of the license is prohibited under this title as a result of an election conducted under AS

04.11.507

; or

the application has not been completed in accordance with AS

04.09.370

or AS

04.11.270

.

An application for renewal of a license may be denied if the applicant is delinquent in the payment of taxes, fees, or penalties due to the state or a local government if the tax liability or fees or penalties assessed arise in whole or in part out of the licensed business.

An application requesting renewal of a conditional contractor’s permit shall be denied if

the board finds, after review of all relevant information, that issuance of the permit would not be in the best interests of the public;

the application has not been completed in accordance with AS

04.11.270

.

Notwithstanding (a)(3) of this section, a theater license issued under AS

04.09.250

, a common carrier dispensary license issued under AS

04.09.260

, or a sporting activity or event license issued under AS

04.09.270

may be renewed if the license was exercised at least once during each of the two preceding calendar years.

The requirements of (a)(3), (5), and (7) of this section do not apply to a manufacturer direct shipment license issued under AS

04.09.370

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 1981; am §§ 22, 23 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 13 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 5 ch 59 SLA 2018; am § 36 ch 8 SLA 2022; am §§ 37 – 40 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.340.
Denial of request for relocation.

An application requesting approval for the relocation of licensed premises shall be denied if

the board finds, after review of all relevant information, that relocation of the license would not be in the best interests of the public;

the relocation is prohibited under AS

04.11.400(a)

or (b);

the license would be relocated out of the established village, incorporated city, unified municipality, or population area established under AS

04.11.400(a)

within which it is located;

transfer of ownership is to be made concurrently with the relocation of the licensed premises and a ground for denial of the transfer of ownership under AS

04.11.360

is presented;

the application has not been completed in accordance with AS

04.11.290

;

relocation of the license would result in violation of a local zoning regulation or ordinance;

relocation of the license would violate the restrictions pertaining to the particular license imposed by this title;

relocation of the license is prohibited under this title as a result of an election conducted under AS

04.11.507

; or

the license was issued under AS

04.11.400(d)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 93 SLA 1985; am § 14 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 41 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, in (10) (now (9)) of this section, internal references were changed to reflect the 1994 reorganization of AS

04.11.400

.

Cross references. —

For board approval of transfers, see AS

04.11.040

.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

For licenses, see 13 AAC 104, art. 3.

Sec. 04.11.340.
Denial of request for relocation.

An application requesting approval for the relocation of licensed premises shall be denied if

the board finds, after review of all relevant information, that relocation of the license would not be in the best interests of the public;

the relocation is prohibited under AS

04.11.400(a)

or (b);

the license would be relocated out of the established village, incorporated city, unified municipality, or population area established under AS

04.11.400(a)

within which it is located except as provided under AS

04.11.400(k)

;

transfer of ownership is to be made concurrently with the relocation of the licensed premises and a ground for denial of the transfer of ownership under AS

04.11.360

is presented;

the application has not been completed in accordance with AS

04.11.290

;

relocation of the license would result in violation of a local zoning regulation or ordinance;

relocation of the license would violate the restrictions pertaining to the particular license imposed by this title; or

relocation of the license is prohibited under this title as a result of an election conducted under AS

04.11.507

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 93 SLA 1985; am § 14 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 41 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 42 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.360.
Denial of transfer of a license to another person.

An application requesting approval of a transfer of a license to another person under this title shall be denied if

the board finds, after review of all relevant information, that transfer of a license to another person would not be in the best interests of the public;

the application has not been completed in accordance with AS

04.11.280

;

the application contains false statements of material fact;

the transferor has not paid all debts or taxes arising from the conduct of the business licensed under this title unless

the transferor gives security for the payment of the debts or taxes satisfactory to the creditor or taxing authority; or

the transfer is under a promise given as collateral by the transferor to the transferee in the course of an earlier transfer of the license under which promise the transferor is obliged to transfer the license back to the transferee in the event of default in payment for property conveyed as part of the earlier transfer of the license;

transfer of the license to another person would result in violation of the provisions of this title relating to identity of licensees and financing of licensees;

transfer of the license to another person would violate the restrictions pertaining to the particular license under this title;

transfer of the license to another person is prohibited under the provisions of this title as a result of an election conducted under AS

04.11.507

;

the prospective transferee does not have the qualifications required under this title of an original applicant; however, an application may not be denied because a prospective transferee under AS

04.11.400(d)(2)

does not have the qualifications required under AS

04.11.400(d)(1)

;

the license was issued under AS

04.11.100(f)

; however, this paragraph does not apply to a beverage dispensary license issued before June 6, 1985, under former AS

04.11.400(j)

if the transfer does not involve a change in location; or

the license was issued under AS

04.11.135

, unless the transferor is also applying to transfer the beverage dispensary license required under AS

04.11.135

to the same transferee.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 111 SLA 1988; am § 15 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 7 ch 41 SLA 2005; am § 6 ch 59 SLA 2018; am § 43 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1994, in (11) (now (9)) of this section, internal references were changed to reflect the 1994 reorganization of AS

04.11.400

.

Cross references. —

For board approval of transfers, see AS

04.11.040

; for application for transfer of a license to another person, see AS

04.11.280

.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 11, 2018, at the end of (8), added “however, an application may not be denied because a prospective transferee under AS

04.11.400(d)(2)

does not have the qualifications required under AS

04.11.400(d)(1)

;”.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Uniform Commercial Code — Bulk Transfers provisions,
AS 45.06 (repealed in 1993) did not govern the transfer of an alcoholic beverage license under paragraph (4)(B) of this section but might be valuable guidelines for the board to follow in promulgating regulations under this section. April 22, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Unless essentially all of a business was being transferred, and not just a liquor license, the UCC-Bulk Transfer provisions (repealed in 1993) did not apply. April 22, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

The federal Internal Revenue Service may assert a lien-like interest, in the form of a hold on transfer of an Alaska liquor license, for taxes but it may not assert a traditional lien against a liquor license. January 17, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

The IRS may not foreclose on a liquor license against which it has a tax lien or lien-like interest. January 17, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

If the IRS has purported to seize a liquor license, it may not operate the license or transfer it to another person without board approval. January 17, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

Unless a debt has been discharged by satisfaction or extinguished by the courts, “debt” would include unpaid obligations, even if a judicial action on the debt is barred by the statute of limitations. January 25, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

Although a local governing body could not assert a hold on transfer of a license for unpaid taxes if the transfer was pursuant to AS

04.11.360

(4)(B), the local governing body could protest the transfer. The ABC Board should uphold a local governing body protest of transfer based on unpaid taxes unless the board finds the protest arbitrary, capricious, and unreasonable based on the particular circumstances. Aug. 29, 1994 Op. Att’y Gen.

The ABC Board has historically not required the satisfaction of a mortgage debt for real property containing the licensed premises as a condition to transfer of the license. The board has found that the debt did not arise from the “conduct of the business licensed.” However, if the seller of the property had restricted the use of the property to a particular use, such as operation of a licensed premises, then it might be appropriate to consider the debt as arising from the licensed business. Otherwise, the board is not required to deviate from its historic practice on this issue. Aug. 29, 1994 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 04.11.360.
Denial of transfer of a license to another person.

An application requesting approval of a transfer of a license to another person under this title shall be denied if

the board finds, after review of all relevant information, that transfer of a license to another person would not be in the best interests of the public;

the application has not been completed in accordance with AS

04.11.280

;

the application contains false statements of material fact;

the transferor has not paid all debts or taxes arising from the conduct of the business licensed under this title unless

the transferor gives security for the payment of the debts or taxes satisfactory to the creditor or taxing authority; or

the transfer is under a promise given as collateral by the transferor to the transferee in the course of an earlier transfer of the license under which promise the transferor is obliged to transfer the license back to the transferee in the event of default in payment for property conveyed as part of the earlier transfer of the license;

transfer of the license to another person would result in violation of the provisions of this title relating to identity of licensees and financing of licensees;

transfer of the license to another person would violate the restrictions pertaining to the particular license under this title;

transfer of the license to another person is prohibited under the provisions of this title as a result of an election conducted under AS

04.11.507

; or

the prospective transferee does not have the qualifications required under this title of an original applicant; however, an application may not be denied because a prospective transferee under AS

04.09.350(c)(2)

does not have the qualifications required under AS

04.09.350(c)(1)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 111 SLA 1988; am § 15 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 7 ch 41 SLA 2005; am § 6 ch 59 SLA 2018; am § 43 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 44 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.365.
Licensed premises in multi-unit residential housing developments owned or financed by the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation.

For premises located in a multi-unit residential housing development owned or financed by the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, the board may issue a new license under AS

04.11.320

, renew a license under AS

04.11.330

, or approve a request for relocation under AS

04.11.340

if the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation authorizes the use under AS

18.56.230

and

the license is for a restaurant or eating place under AS

04.11.100

; or

the premises are designated by the board as a restaurant under AS

04.16.049

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 57 SLA 2013)

Sec. 04.11.365.
Licensed premises in multi-unit residential housing developments owned or financed by the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation.

For premises located in a multi-unit residential housing development owned or financed by the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, the board may issue a new license under AS

04.11.320

, renew a license under AS

04.11.330

, or approve a request for relocation under AS

04.11.340

if the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation authorizes the use under AS

18.56.230

and

the license is a

restaurant or eating place license under AS

04.09.210

; or

seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license under AS

04.09.360

; or

the premises are covered by a restaurant endorsement under AS

04.09.450

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 57 SLA 2013; am § 45 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.370.
Suspension and revocation of licenses and permits.

A license or permit shall be suspended or revoked if the board finds

misrepresentation of a material fact on an application made under this title or a regulation adopted under this title;

continuation of the manufacture, sale, or service of alcoholic beverages by the licensee or permittee would be contrary to the best interests of the public;

failure on the part of the licensee to correct a defect that constitutes a violation of this title, a condition or restriction imposed by the board, a regulation adopted under this title, or other laws after receipt of notice issued by the board or its agent;

conviction of a licensee of a violation of this title, a regulation adopted under this title, or an ordinance adopted under AS

04.21.010

;

conviction of an agent or employee of a licensee of a violation of this title, a regulation adopted under this title, or an ordinance adopted under AS

04.21.010

, if the licensee is found by the board to have either knowingly allowed the violation or to have recklessly or with criminal negligence failed to act in accordance with the duty prescribed under AS

04.21.030

with the result that the agent or employee violates a law, regulation, or ordinance;

failure of the licensee to comply with the public health, fire, or safety laws and regulations in the state;

use of the licensed premises as a resort for illegal possessors or users of narcotics, prostitutes, or sex traffickers; in addition to any other legally competent evidence, the character of the premises may be proved by the general reputation of the premises in the community as a resort for illegal possessors or users of narcotics, prostitutes, or sex traffickers;

occurrence of illegal gambling within the limits of the licensed premises;

the licensee permitted a public offense involving moral turpitude to occur on the licensed premises;

violation by a licensee of this title, a condition or restriction imposed by the board, a regulation adopted under this title, or an ordinance adopted under AS 04.21.010; or

violation by an agent or employee of a licensee of a provision of this title, a condition or restriction imposed by the board, a regulation adopted under this title, or an ordinance adopted under AS 04.21.010, if the licensee is found by the board to have either knowingly allowed the violation or to have recklessly or with criminal negligence failed to act in accordance with the duty prescribed under AS

04.21.030

with the result that the agent or employee violates the law, condition or restriction, regulation, or ordinance.

If the board finds that a licensee or permittee has been convicted of a violation of a criminal law related to gambling under AS

11.66.200

—

11.66.280

, the board shall suspend the license or permit for a period of at least six months if the offense is the person’s first conviction or violation and shall revoke the license or permit if the offense is the person’s second or subsequent conviction or violation.

If the board receives notice from the Department of Revenue that a licensee or permittee has violated a provision of AS 05.15 related to gambling, the board

may suspend the license or permit; and

shall suspend the license or permit for a period of at least 30 days if the offense is the person’s second or subsequent violation of AS 05.15 related to gambling.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 37 SLA 1986; am §§ 16, 17 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 2 ch 1 TSSLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For procedures and requirements for revocations under (a)(4) or (5) of this section, see AS

04.11.530

and

04.11.535

; for revocations or suspensions under (a)(4) or (5) of this section, see AS

04.16.180

.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

For enforcement, see 13 AAC 104, art. 5.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 27(a), ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that the 2012 amendments to (a) of this section apply to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2012.

Legislative history reports. —

For the governor's transmittal letter concerning
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012 (HB 359), see 2012 House Journal 1666 — 1668.

Sec. 04.11.370.
Suspension and revocation of licenses and permits.

A license, endorsement, or permit shall be suspended or revoked if the board finds

misrepresentation of a material fact on an application made under this title or a regulation adopted under this title;

continuation of the manufacture, sale, or service of alcoholic beverages by the licensee or permittee would be contrary to the best interests of the public;

failure on the part of the licensee to correct a defect that constitutes a violation of this title, a condition or restriction imposed by the board, a regulation adopted under this title, or other laws after receipt of notice issued by the board or its agent;

conviction of a licensee of a violation of this title, a regulation adopted under this title, or an ordinance adopted under AS

04.21.010

;

conviction of an agent or employee of a licensee of a violation of this title, a regulation adopted under this title, or an ordinance adopted under AS

04.21.010

, if the licensee is found by the board to have either knowingly allowed the violation or to have recklessly or with criminal negligence failed to act in accordance with the duty prescribed under AS

04.21.030

with the result that the agent or employee violates a law, regulation, or ordinance;

failure of the licensee to comply with the public health, fire, or safety laws and regulations in the state;

use of the licensed premises as a resort for illegal possessors or users of narcotics, prostitutes, or sex traffickers; in addition to any other legally competent evidence, the character of the premises may be proved by the general reputation of the premises in the community as a resort for illegal possessors or users of narcotics, prostitutes, or sex traffickers;

occurrence of illegal gambling within the limits of the licensed premises;

the licensee permitted a public offense involving moral turpitude to occur on the licensed premises;

violation by a licensee of this title, a condition or restriction imposed by the board, a regulation adopted under this title, or an ordinance adopted under AS 04.21.010; or

violation by an agent or employee of a licensee of a provision of this title, a condition or restriction imposed by the board, a regulation adopted under this title, or an ordinance adopted under AS 04.21.010, if the licensee is found by the board to have either knowingly allowed the violation or to have recklessly or with criminal negligence failed to act in accordance with the duty prescribed under AS

04.21.030

with the result that the agent or employee violates the law, condition or restriction, regulation, or ordinance.

If the board finds that a licensee or permittee has been convicted of a violation of a criminal law related to gambling under AS

11.66.200

—

11.66.280

, the board shall suspend the license or permit for a period of at least six months if the offense is the person’s first conviction or violation and shall revoke the license or permit if the offense is the person’s second or subsequent conviction or violation.

If the board receives notice from the Department of Revenue that a licensee or permittee has violated a provision of AS 05.15 related to gambling, the board

may suspend the license or permit; and

shall suspend the license or permit for a period of at least 30 days if the offense is the person’s second or subsequent violation of AS 05.15 related to gambling.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 37 SLA 1986; am §§ 16, 17 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 2 ch 1 TSSLA 2012; am § 46 ch 8 SLA 2022)